Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 1. State Bonding Act.

Sec. 37.15.010.
Full faith and credit for general obligation bonds.

The full faith, credit, and resources of the state are hereby pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on all general obligation bonds of the state authorized pursuant to art. IX, § 8 of the constitution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1967)

Collateral references. —

63A Am.Jur.2d, Public Funds, § 20 et seq.

64 Am.Jur.2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 434-455.

Sec. 37.15.011.
Alaska debt retirement fund.

The Alaska debt retirement fund is established as a separate fund in the general fund. The fund consists of all money appropriated to it.

The Alaska debt retirement fund shall be invested by the Department of Revenue so as to yield competitive market rates, as provided in AS

37.10.071

. Money in the fund may be appropriated

for the purposes set out in AS

37.15.012

;

to reimburse municipalities for obligations authorized under AS

14.11.100

;

to finance the acquisition of state facilities through lease-purchase agreements; and

if an unobligated balance remains, to finance the design and construction of capital projects.

History.

(§ 2 ch 87 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 87, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 37.15.012.
Continuing debt service appropriation.

The amounts required annually to pay the principal, interest, and redemption premium on all issued and outstanding general obligation bonds of the state are appropriated each fiscal year from the Alaska debt retirement fund to the state bond committee to make all required payments of principal, interest, and redemption premium. If the balance of the Alaska debt retirement fund is insufficient to fully pay these amounts, the necessary additional amounts are appropriated from the general fund to the state bond committee to make all required payments of principal, interest, and redemption premium.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 156 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1991)

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section does not represent an unconstitutional dedication of public funds under § 7, art. IX, of the state constitution, as that section of the constitution contains an implied exception for bond obligations.
November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.15.015.
Notice before election.

Before a general or special election in which a bond issue is offered for ratification, the state bond committee shall publish a notice of existing state bonded indebtedness at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each of the four judicial districts of the state. The first notice shall be published at least 20 days before the date of the election. A notice must contain

the current total bonded indebtedness of the state;

the cost of the debt service on the current indebtedness;

the projected amount of state general obligation debt principal that could be issued and paid for from the Alaska debt retirement fund;

the estimated debt service requirements for the bond issue offered for ratification; and

whether the bond issue offered for ratification will be repaid with amounts from the Alaska debt retirement fund.

Neither the failure to publish the notice of existing state bonded indebtedness nor a defect in the publication affects the validity of the bond issue offered for ratification or of a general or special election in which a bond issue is offered for ratification.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1969; am § 4 ch 87 SLA 1991)

Sec. 37.15.020.
Manner and amounts of sale.

The state bond committee shall sell the bonds of each authorization in the amounts or series and at the times which it finds are for the best interests of the state and its inhabitants.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.030.
Interest rate and maturity.

Each issue or series of bonds must bear interest at an effective rate over the life of the bonds not to exceed 11 percent a year or that rate of interest that is 110 percent of the rate of the Bond Buyer Index of 20 Municipal Bond Average Yields for the week previous to the date of sale of the bonds, whichever is higher.
The bonds must mature in not more than 30 years from date of issue, unless a longer period is specifically authorized by statute.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 92 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1982)

Sec. 37.15.040.
Sale of bonds.

Before selling an issue or series of bonds, the state bond committee shall give notice inviting sealed bids in a manner that it may prescribe.
If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder.
If the state bond committee determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, it may reject all bids received.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1969)

Sec. 37.15.050.
Redemption.

The state bond committee may determine whether the bonds are subject to redemption before their fixed maturities and may fix the premium for and all other terms of the redemption.
A bond is not subject to redemption before its fixed maturity date unless the right to so redeem the bond is expressly mentioned on the face of the bond.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 104 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1968; am § 7 ch 143 SLA 1968)

Collateral references. —

81A C.J.S., States, § 448.

Sec. 37.15.060.
Form and registration of bonds.

An issue or series of bonds may be issued in coupon form payable to bearer or in fully registered form, and bonds in coupon form may be made registrable as to principal or principal and interest, as determined by the state bond committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1968)

Sec. 37.15.070.
Place of payment.

The state bond committee may fix the place or places of payment of the principal, interest and redemption premium, if any.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 104 SLA 1967)

Sec. 37.15.080.
Signatures and seal.

Each bond shall be signed on behalf of the state by the governor and attested by the lieutenant governor, which signatures may be facsimile signatures. The seal of the state shall be impressed, imprinted or otherwise reproduced on each bond. Each interest coupon attached to the bond shall be signed by the facsimile signatures of the governor and lieutenant governor. If an officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before delivery of the bonds, the signature is, nevertheless, valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if the officer had remained in office until delivery.

A signature required on a bond issued by a political subdivision of the state may be a facsimile signature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1967)

Sec. 37.15.090.
Terms and conditions.

Each issue or series of bonds shall be issued under and subject to the terms, conditions, and covenants providing for the payment of the principal and the interest and other terms, conditions, covenants, and protective provisions safeguarding the payment as found reasonably necessary by the state bond committee for the most advantageous sale.
The terms, conditions, and covenants may include the setting aside and maintaining of certain reserves to secure the payment of principal and interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.100.
Trustee.

If the state bond committee finds it necessary to accomplish the most advantageous sale of the bonds, the committee shall select a trustee for the owners and holders of the bonds or for the safeguarding and disbursement of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds for the use and purpose for which issued, and shall fix the rights, duties, powers, and obligations of the trustee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.110.
Creation and membership of state bond committee.

There is created a committee known as the “state bond committee,” the members of which are the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, the commissioner of administration, and the commissioner of revenue.
If a member of the committee is absent or otherwise unable to act, the member’s designee in the department shall act as a member of the committee in the member’s place.

History.

(§ 2 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 104 SLA 1967; am § 81 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 37.15.120.
Regulations.

The state bond committee may adopt regulations for the performance of its duties and may designate by resolution one of its members to perform any act necessary to effectuate its duties not required by statute to be performed by the state bond committee in meeting or by resolution, or by another officer of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 104 SLA 1967)

Sec. 37.15.130.
Officers, records, and proceedings.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development is the chairman of the state bond committee and the commissioner of revenue is the secretary.
A majority of the members of the committee constitute a quorum.
The committee shall keep a full, complete, and permanent record of its proceedings.
All records and correspondence of the committee shall be kept in the office of the commissioner of revenue.

History.

(§ 2 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 82 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 37.15.140.
Duties of state bond committee.

The state bond committee shall adopt the resolution and prepare the documents necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of bonds.

History.

(§ 3 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.150.
Committee may employ special services.

If the state bond committee considers it necessary and advisable, it may procure architectural or engineering, fiscal agent or municipal investment, legal and other expert or specialized services at reasonable and customary fees to assist it in accomplishing the most advantageous sale of the bonds. The fees may be paid from the proceeds of the sale or advanced from the contingency fund in the office of the governor or otherwise.

History.

(§ 3 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.155.
Prohibited bidding on bonds and anticipation notes.

A person who provides financial programming or marketing assistance to the state bond committee in connection with the issuance or sale of general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or bond anticipation notes of the state may not bid on the bonds.

The sale of general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or bond anticipation notes of the state to a person who is prohibited from bidding on the bonds or notes under (a) of this section is against public policy and the sale is void.

In this section “person” means an individual, firm, agent, factor, intermediary, partnership, corporation, association, bond house, stockbroker, or bond broker.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1974)

Sec. 37.15.160.
Contents of resolution.

The resolution adopted by the state bond committee must

fix the principal amount, denominations, date, maturities, place of payment, terms, right of redemption if any, form, conditions, and covenants of the bonds;

fix the date of sale and the form of the notice of sale; and

provide if the notice is to be published elsewhere in addition to the publication required by AS

37.15.040

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1968)

Sec. 37.15.170.
State bond committee to certify annual principal, interest, and reserve requirements.

Before December 1 of each year after bonds are issued, the state bond committee shall certify to the commissioner of administration the amount needed for the following calendar year to meet principal, interest, and reserve requirements on all bonds or issues or series of bonds then outstanding, including reimbursements authorized under AS

14.11.100

.

The commissioner of administration shall set aside these amounts or make the necessary provisions for the setting aside of these amounts so that there will be sufficient money to pay the principal and interest on the due date and to meet reserve requirements.

Before December 1 of each year, the state bond committee shall report to the governor the current fund balance in the Alaska debt retirement fund. The report must contain an estimate of the amount of state general obligation debt principal that could be issued and paid for from the fund. The state bond committee shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 4 ch 175 SLA 1960; am §§ 5, 6 ch 87 SLA 1991; am § 64 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 37.15.180.
Remedies of bondholders.

The owner and holder of each bond or the trustee may by appropriate proceeding require and compel the transfer and payment of money as directed by this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.190.
Negotiability.

General obligation bonds of the state and the coupons attached to the bonds are negotiable instruments.

History.

(§ 5 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Collateral references. —

Right of secured creditor to have set aside fraudulent transfer of other property by his debtor.
8 ALR4th 1123.

Sec. 37.15.200.
Bonds as legal investments.

General obligation bonds of the state are legal investments for all state funds, or for funds under state control, and for all funds of a political subdivision of the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 175 SLA 1960)

Sec. 37.15.210.
Refunding bonds.

All or a part of the general obligation bonds of the state, or all or a part of each outstanding issue or series of bonds, may be refunded at or before maturity by the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds of the state if, in the opinion of the state bond committee, refunding is advantageous to and in the best interest of the state and its inhabitants. Money set aside as reserve to secure the payment of the principal and interest of bonds being refunded may be used to pay the principal and interest on these bonds or may be retained by the state to secure the payment of the principal and interest on the refunding bonds to be issued.

Refunding bonds and the coupons attached to them are negotiable instruments. The effective rate of interest over the life of refunding bonds may not exceed 11 percent a year or that rate of interest that is 110 percent of the rate of the Bond Buyer Index of 20 Municipal Bond Average Yields for the week previous to the date of sale of bonds, whichever is higher, and the amount of premium that is paid to effect the redemption of outstanding bonds may not be considered in determining the effective rate of interest.

Refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds being refunded or refunding bonds may be sold in the manner and at the prices that the state bond committee determines to be for the best interest of the state and its inhabitants either at public or private sale.

The issuance of refunding bonds need not be authorized by the qualified voters of the state. The state bond committee shall adopt the resolution and prepare the documents necessary for the issuance, exchange or sale, and delivery of refunding bonds. The provisions of this chapter relating to the terms, conditions, covenants, issuance, and sale of general obligation bonds of the state apply to refunding bonds except as otherwise specifically provided in this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 92 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 85 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 110 SLA 1982)

Collateral references. —

Power of governmental unit to issue bonds as implying power to refund them. 1 ALR2d 134.

Sec. 37.15.215.
Official statements.

To the extent practicable the official statements and other documentation issued in connection with an offering of state or local government securities must comply with the guidelines of the Municipal Finance Officers Association or other nationally recognized guidelines.

History.

(§ 12 ch 168 SLA 1978)

Sec. 37.15.220.
Short title.

AS

37.15.010

—

37.15.220

may be cited as the State Bonding Act.

History.

(§ 7 ch 175 SLA 1960; am § 54 ch 127 SLA 1974)